Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-418
Board; legal counsel.

The county attorney of the county in which the board operates shall act as legal advisor for the board without extra compensation; Provided, the board may employ from time to time for special pieces of legal work additional counsel, whenever it deems such employment necessary for the administration of its affairs and business.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 9, p. 586;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-419;

R.S.1943, § 72-418.